Utah statutes.
57-8-15.   Bylaws.

The administration of every property shall be governed by bylaws, which may either be embodied in the declaration or in a separate instrument, a true copy of which shall be appended to and recorded with the declaration. No modification or amendment of the declaration or bylaws shall be valid unless the same is set forth in an amendment and such amendment is recorded.



Enacted by Chapter 111, 1963 General Session

